Nebraska, session 109, LB123.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 13-522, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-522 (1) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall prepare budget documents
to be submitted by governmental units which calculate the restricted funds
authority for each governmental unit. Each governmental unit shall submit its
calculated restricted funds authority with its budget documents at the time the
budgets are due to the Auditor of Public Accounts. If the Auditor of Public
Accounts determines from the budget documents that a governmental unit is not
complying with the budget limits provided in sections 13-518 to 13-522, he or
she shall notify the governing body of his or her determination and notify the
State Treasurer of the noncompliance.
(2)(a) Upon receiving notice from the Auditor of Public Accounts, the The
State Treasurer shall then suspend distribution of state aid allocated to the
governmental unit until such sections are complied with. The funds shall be
held for six months until the governmental unit complies, and if the
governmental unit complies within the six-month period, it shall receive the
suspended funds, but after six months, if the governmental unit fails to
comply, the suspended funds shall be forfeited and shall be (i) redistributed
to other recipients of the state aid in the county where such noncompliant
governmental unit is located or returned to the Highway Allocation Fund if
there is no eligible recipient or (ii) , in the case of a homestead exemption
reimbursement, returned to the General Fund.
(b) The governmental unit shall continue to forfeit state aid until the
governmental unit reaches compliance and the State Treasurer has received
notification of such compliance from the Auditor of Public Accounts. All state
aid that was forfeited shall remain forfeited and redistributed according to
subdivision (a)(i) of this subsection.
(3) If any governmental unit fails to reach compliance within twelve
months after the time of the order and notice of delinquency given by the
Auditor of Public Accounts to the State Treasurer, such governmental unit shall
be ineligible for future distributions of state aid. Upon reaching compliance,
the governmental unit shall be eligible for future distributions of state aid.
Sec. 2. Section 13-3407, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-3407 (1) The auditor shall prepare forms to be used by political
subdivisions for the purpose of calculating property tax request authority and
unused property tax request authority. Each political subdivision shall
calculate such amounts and submit the forms to the auditor on or before
September 30, 2025, and on or before September 30 of each year thereafter. If a
political subdivision fails to submit such forms to the auditor or if the
auditor determines from such forms that a political subdivision is not
complying with the limits provided in the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act,
the auditor shall notify the political subdivision and the State Treasurer of
the noncompliance.
(2)(a) Upon receiving notice from the auditor, the The State Treasurer
shall then suspend distribution of state aid allocated to the political
subdivision until the political subdivision complies. The funds shall be held
for six months. If the political subdivision complies within the six-month
period, it shall receive the suspended funds. If the political subdivision
fails to comply within the six-month period, the suspended funds shall be
forfeited and shall be (i) redistributed to other recipients of the state aid
in the county where such noncompliant political subdivision is located or
returned to the Highway Allocation Fund if there is no eligible recipient or
(ii) , in the case of a homestead exemption reimbursement, returned to the
General Fund.
(b) The political subdivision shall continue to forfeit state aid until
the political subdivision reaches compliance and the State Treasurer has
received notification of such compliance from the auditor. All state aid that
was forfeited shall remain forfeited and redistributed according to subdivision
(a)(i) of this subsection.
(3) If any political subdivision fails to reach compliance within twelve
months after the time of the order and notice of delinquency given by the
auditor to the State Treasurer, such political subdivision shall be ineligible
for future distributions of state aid. Upon reaching compliance, the political
-1-

LB123 LB123
2025 2025
subdivision shall be eligible for future distributions of state aid.
Sec. 3. Section 19-2907, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
19-2907 Should any municipality fail or refuse to cause an annual audit to
be made of all of its functions, activities, and transactions for the fiscal
year within a period of six months following the close of such fiscal year,
then and in such event, any resident taxpayer may make a written demand on the
city council or village board of trustees of such municipality to commence such
annual audit within thirty days, and if such demand is ignored, a mandamus
action may be instituted by any taxpayer or taxpayers residing in such
municipality against the municipal authorities of such municipality requiring
the municipality to proceed forthwith to cause such audit to be made, and if
such action is decided in favor of the taxpayer or taxpayers instituting the
same, the municipal authorities of such municipality shall be personally, and
jointly and severally, liable for the costs of such action, including a
reasonable attorney's fee to be allowed by the court for the attorney employed
by the taxpayer or taxpayers and who prosecuted the action. Upon a failure,
refusal, or neglect to cause such annual audit to be made as required by
sections 19-2903 and 19-2904, and a failure to file a copy thereof with the
Auditor of Public Accounts as required by section 19-2905, the Auditor of
Public Accounts shall, after due notice and a hearing to show cause by such
city or village, notify the State Treasurer of such failure to file a copy with
the Auditor of Public Accounts. The State Treasurer shall, upon receipt of such
notice, withhold distribution of all money to which such city or village may be
entitled under the provisions of sections 39-2511 to 39-2520, until such annual
audit shall have been made and have been filed with the Auditor of Public
Accounts. If such annual audit is not filed within a period of six months from
the time of the order and notice of delinquency given by the Auditor of Public
Accounts to the State Treasurer, the amount so withheld shall be distributed to
the other cities and villages in the county where such delinquent city is
located. Upon compliance with the law requiring annual audits, the delinquent
city or village shall again become entitled to distribution of all money to
which it is entitled from the State Treasurer beginning with the date of such
compliance. If any city or village fails to reach compliance within twelve
months after the time of the order and notice of delinquency given by the
Auditor of Public Accounts to the State Treasurer, the city or village shall no
longer be entitled to the distribution of money under sections 39-2511 to
39-2520. Upon reaching compliance, the city or village shall become entitled to
future distributions of money under sections 39-2511 to 39-2520.
Sec. 4. Original sections 13-522 and 19-2907, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 13-3407, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
-2-